Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 14

State Capitol Police

12-14-101. Establishment — Powers.

In such a manner as will most effectually secure the citizens and their property in and around the State Capitol, the Secretary of State may:

(1)The Secretary of State may designate and appoint one (1) or more of his or her employees as State Capitol Police, who shall be peace officers under the laws of the state and shall have and possess all the powers provided by the law for Arkansas State Police, city police, and county sheriffs to be exercised as required for the protection of the State Capitol grounds, together with such other duties as may be assigned by the Secretary of State.

An officer of the State Capitol Police may act in his or her official capacity and exercise his or her powers anywhere within the boundaries of the State of Arkansas.

None of the present jurisdiction or powers of the Department of Arkansas State Police, county police, or city police shall be ceded to the State Capitol Police over the land or property which constitutes the State Capitol grounds or within the boundaries of the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 468, § 1; 2005, No. 167, § 1.

12-14-102. Duties — Authority.

Except to the extent otherwise limited by the Secretary of State, State Capitol Police appointed pursuant to the authority contained in this chapter shall:

Protect property;

Preserve and maintain proper order and decorum;

Prevent unlawful assemblies and disorderly conduct;

Exclude and eject persons from and prevent trespass upon and in all of the State Capitol grounds and other grounds, buildings, improvements, streets, alleys, and sidewalks under control of the Secretary of State; and

The State Capitol Police officers shall have and exercise police supervision on behalf of the Secretary of State and are authorized as peace officers to arrest, with or without warrant, any person upon or in the areas described in this section or within the boundaries of the State of Arkansas who is or is reasonably believed to be committing an offense against any laws of the State of Arkansas or against the ordinances of the city where the State Capitol grounds are located, and to deliver the person before any court of competent jurisdiction to be dealt with according to law.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 468, § 1; 2005, No. 167, § 2.

12-14-103. Rules.

The Secretary of State is hereby authorized and empowered to promulgate rules, and to amend or change the same from time to time as he or she shall deem necessary, providing for the operation and organization of the State Capitol Police, so long as such rules are not arbitrary or capricious.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 468, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 875.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in the section heading and twice in the text.

12-14-104. Territory — Cumulative remedies.

This chapter shall apply to and encompass all lands, buildings, and improvements that are commonly referred to as the State Capitol grounds and additional areas set out in this section and that are bounded as follows: Beginning at the point where the centerline of Tenth Street intersects the eastern edge of the right-of-way of the Missouri Pacific and Rock Island Railroad Line, then northeast along the southern boundary of that right-of-way to the point where the centerline of Cross Street, extended northeast, intersects that right-of-way, then south along the centerline of Cross Street to the point where that line intersects the northern edge of the Wilbur Mills Freeway, also known as I-630, surveyed by the Arkansas Department of Transportation, to the point of the beginning.

However, nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted as in any way interfering with the ownership and control that are by law now vested in the governing boards of each department as to its lands, buildings, and improvements.

The provisions of this chapter shall be cumulative to any remedies that each department may now possess for enforcing its rules, including its rights to:

Impose sanctions through fees and charges;

Discipline;

Deny service; and

Expel.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (a)(1).

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in the introductory language of (b).

Employees shall be eligible for all or a portion of additional salary payments scheduled as follows:

General certificate — three hundred dollars ($300) annually;

Intermediate certificate — six hundred dollars ($600) annually;

Advanced certificate — nine hundred dollars ($900) annually; and

Senior certificate — one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200) annually.

Payment of additional salary payments may be made monthly, quarterly, semiannually, or annually depending upon the availability of revenues and shall be restricted to the following classifications:

State Capitol Police Chief;

State Capitol Police Assistant Chief;

State Capitol Police sergeant; and

State Capitol Police corporal.

Payments made under this section which are awarded as partial or lump-sum payments shall not be considered as salary for purposes of retirement benefits but shall be subject to withholding of all applicable federal and state taxes.

Payments made under this section shall not be construed as exceeding the maximum annual salary of the employee.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 68, § 16, provided:

“STATE CAPITOL POLICE. In the event that sufficient revenues, in the judgment of the Secretary of State exist, the Secretary is hereby authorized to make additional salary payments from such funds to those employees who have attained law enforcement certification above the basic certificate level, as defined by the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards. It is the intent of this Section that such payment shall be optional, at the discretion of the Secretary, dependent on sufficient revenues and shall not be implemented using funds specifically set aside for other programs within the Department.

“Employees shall be eligible for all or a portion of additional salary payments scheduled as follows:

“I.General Certificate — $ 300 annually

“II.Intermediate Certificate — $ 600 annually

“III.Advanced Certificate — $ 900 annually

“IV.Senior Certificate — $1,200 annually

“Payment of such funds may be made monthly, quarterly, semiannually or annually depending upon the availability of revenues and shall be restricted to the following classifications:

“1.Sec. of State Capitol Police Chief

“2.Sec. of State Police Sergeant

“3.Sec. of State Corporal

“4.Sec. of State Capitol Police Captain

“Payments made under this Section which are awarded as partial or lump sum payments shall not be considered as salary for purposes of retirement benefits but shall be subject to withholding of all applicable federal and state taxes. Payments made under this Section shall not be construed as exceeding the maximum annual salary of the employee.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Amendments. The 2005 amendment inserted present (c)(2)(B) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

Cross References. Additional salary payments for Arkansas State Police, §12-8-215.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 468, § 1; 2001, No. 1082, § 1; 2017, No. 707, § 19;
2019, No. 315, § 876.

12-14-105. Enforcement — Fines.

The prosecuting attorney or the city attorney, as may be appropriate, shall appear and prosecute all actions arising in any court under the provisions of this chapter.

All fines which may be collected by any court on account of the violation of this chapter shall be remitted by the tenth day of each month to the Administration of Justice Funds Section of the Office of Administrative Services of the Department of Finance and Administration on a form provided by that office, to be deposited into the State Treasury and placed to the credit of the State Capitol Police.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 468, § 1; 2003, No. 1765, § 6.

12-14-106. Additional salary payments.

In the event that sufficient revenues in the judgment of the Secretary of State exist, the Secretary of State may make additional salary payments from those funds to those employees who have attained law enforcement certification above the basic certificate level, as defined by the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training.

It is the intent of this section that the payment shall be optional, at the discretion of the Secretary of State, dependent on sufficient revenues, and shall not be implemented using funds specifically set aside for other programs within the office of the Secretary of State.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 976, § 18; 2005, No. 167, § 3.

12-14-107. Assignment of officer to Senate.

(1)Upon request, one (1) member of the State Capitol Police shall be assigned to the Senate.

The officer shall be selected by the Chair of the Senate Efficiency Committee or his or her designee in charge of security procedures for the Senate.

The officer shall remain a full-time employee of the State Capitol Police with accrued benefits and remain on duty with the State Capitol Police when not on call with the Senate.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 976, § 19.

12-14-108. Award of pistol upon retirement or death.

When a State Capitol Police officer retires from service or dies while still employed with the State Capitol Police, in recognition of and appreciation for the service of the retiring or deceased officer, the Secretary of State may award the pistol carried by the officer at the time of his or her death or retirement from service to:

The officer; or

The officer's spouse if the spouse is eligible under applicable state and federal laws to possess a firearm.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 167, § 4.

12-14-109. Certain records exempt.

A record or other information related to the operations, emergency procedure, and security personnel of the State Capitol Police is confidential and not subject to disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq., including without limitation:

Records or other information that upon disclosure could reasonably be expected to be detrimental to the public safety, including without limitation records or other information concerning emergency or security plans, State Capitol Building or Capitol Hill apartment complex safety plans, monitoring capabilities, procedures, risk assessments, studies, measures, or systems; and

Records or other information relating to the number of licensed security officers, certified State Capitol Police officers, or other security personnel, as well as any personal information about a security officer, certified State Capitol Police officer, or other security personnel.

[Reserved.]

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, No. 539, § 5: Mar. 28, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that a prosecuting attorney and his or her deputy prosecuting attorneys perform a vital public function and often are in dangerous situations due to the nature of the crimes they prosecute; and that this act is immediately necessary because allowing a prosecuting attorney and his or her deputy prosecuting attorneys to carry a firearm or concealed handgun is essential to the safe operation of criminal justice in this state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 474, § 1.